Maine, session 132, LD1252.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §320-C, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Uses of disbursements limited. Disbursements from the funds are limited to
producers that have a processing or manufacturing facility that is located in the State or
producers that are seeking to establish a new processing or manufacturing facility in the
State. A producer receiving a disbursement pursuant to this section shall use the
disbursement to support the operations of a processing or manufacturing facility located in
this State for the purposes described in this subsection, including but not limited to
obtaining equipment and investing in supply chain infrastructure to grow, harvest, process
or manufacture agricultural, food or forest products used in commercial products. In
carrying out these purposes, the producer shall obtain, to the extent practicable,
agricultural, food or forest products from a farm or a forest or waters in the State or from
offshore waters to be collected in the State.
Sec. 2. 7 MRSA §320-C, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Board member conflicts of interest. If a member of the board has a conflict of
interest with regard to a vote the board is holding, the member may not participate in that
vote. For the purposes of this subsection, "conflict of interest" means that the member of
the board or the member's immediate family member has or would acquire a direct and
substantial personal financial interest, distinct from that of the general public, in an
enterprise that would be financially benefited by a proposed fund allocation. For the
purposes of this subsection, "immediate family member" means an individual's spouse,
domestic partner or child.